Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1176, as
last amended by Section 10, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1176), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1176. A. Whoever, with the intent to threaten,
intimidate or harass, or facilitate another to threaten, intimidate
or harass, uses an electronic communication device to knowingly
publish, post or otherwise make publicly available personally
identifiable information of a peace officer, public official,
election official, medical care provider, or crime victim, and as a
result places that peace officer, public official, election
official, medical care provider, or crime victim in reasonable fear
of death or serious bodily injury shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a
term not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine not to exceed One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
Upon conviction for a second or subsequent violation, the person

shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not
to exceed one (1) year, or by a fine not to exceed Two Thousand
Dollars ($2,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
B. To the extent the provisions of Section subsection A of this
section apply to medical care providers, the protections provided
herein shall not apply when the incident is unrelated to the
provider's professional duties.
C. As used in this section:
1. "Crime victim" shall have the same meaning as defined in
Section 142A-1 of this title;
2. "Election Official official" means a member or employee of
the State Election Board or a county election board, the Secretary
of the State Election Board or a county election board, or a person
serving as a precinct official or absentee voting board member
appointed as required by law;
3. "Electronic communication" shall have the same meaning as
defined in Section 1172 of this title. Electronic communication
does not include broadcast transmissions or similar communications
that are not targeted at any specific individual;
4. "Electronic communication device" means any cellular
telephone, facsimile, pager, computer, or any device capable of
electronic communication;
5. "Medical care provider" means a doctor, resident, intern,
nurse, nurse practitioner, nurses' aide, ambulance attendant or
operator, paramedic, emergency medical technician, laboratory
technician, radiologic technologist, physical therapist, physician
assistant, chaplain of a health care facility, volunteer of a health
care facility, pharmacist, nursing student, medical student, member
of a hospital security force, and any other employee or contractor
working in or for a health care facility;
6. "Peace officer" shall have the same meaning as that term is
defined in Section 99 of this title;
7. "Personally identifiable information" means information
which can identify an individual including but not limited to name,
birth date, place of birth, mother's maiden name, biometric records,
Social Security number, official state- or government-issued driver
ENR. H. B. NO. 3678 Page 2

license or identification number, government passport number,
employer or taxpayer identification number or any other information
that is linked or linkable to an individual, such as medical,
educational, financial or employment information;
8. "Public official" means any person elected or appointed to a
state office in the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of
state government or other political subdivision of the state,
including any person elected or appointed to a municipal office,
authority, board or commission, or public school board; and
9. "Publish" means to circulate, deliver, distribute,
disseminate, transmit, or otherwise make available to another
person.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3678 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3678 Page 4